Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7615.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-77 of the General Laws entitled "Establishment of Charter Public
Schools [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
16-77-13. Local communities permitted to adopt all-charter public school model for
public education.
(a) Each city and town of this state may adopt, as an alternative to traditional public schools,
an all-charter public school model, to provide public education. This process may utilize the
establishment of all new charter public schools, a conversion of traditional public schools to charter
public schools, or a combination thereof. A municipality seeking to convert to an all-charter public
school model shall submit a plan detailing the provision of education under the plan (“the plan”),
as well as how the municipality shall transition into the plan.
(b) The plan referred to in subsection (a) of this section shall be presented to both the
municipality’s council, board, or other governing body, and to the school committee or board of
the municipality. If both the governing body and the school committee of the municipality vote in
favor of the plan, then the plan shall be presented and submitted to the voters of the municipality
as a referendum at either a special or general election. Upon affirmative vote of those voting in the
election in favor of and approving the plan, the plan shall be deemed approved. In such event, the
municipality may undertake such measures as set forth in the plan and as are otherwise necessary
to implement the all-charter public school model within the municipality.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004888
========
LC004888 - Page 2 of 3